Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.637

Clean-fuel vehicles—Purchasing requirements.

(1) At least thirty percent of all new vehicles purchased through a state contract shall be clean-fuel vehicles.

(2) The percentage of clean-fuel vehicles purchased through a state contract shall increase at the rate of five percent each year.

(3) In meeting the procurement requirement established in this section, preference shall be given to vehicles designed to operate exclusively on clean fuels. In the event that vehicles designed to operate exclusively on clean fuels are not available or would not meet the operational requirements for which a vehicle is to be procured, conventionally powered vehicles may be converted to clean fuel or dual fuel use to meet the requirements of this section.

(4) Fuel purchased through a state contract shall be a clean fuel when the fuel is purchased for the operation of a clean-fuel vehicle.

(5)(a) Weight classes are established by the following motor vehicle types:

(i) Passenger cars;

(ii) Light duty trucks, trucks with a gross vehicle weight rating by the vehicle manufacturer of less than eight thousand five hundred pounds;

(iii) Heavy duty trucks, trucks with a gross vehicle weight rating by the vehicle manufacturer of eight thousand five hundred pounds or more.

(b) This subsection does not place an obligation upon the state or its political subdivisions to purchase vehicles in any number or weight class other than to meet the percent procurement requirement.

(6) The provisions for purchasing clean-fuel vehicles under subsections (1) and (2) of this section are intended as minimum levels. The department should seek to increase the purchasing levels of clean-fuel vehicles above the minimum. The department must also investigate all opportunities to aggregate their purchasing with local governments to determine whether or not they can lower their costs and make it cost-efficient to increase the percentage of clean-fuel or high gas mileage vehicles in both the state and local fleets.

(7) For the purposes of this section, "clean fuels" and "clean-fuel vehicles" shall be those fuels and vehicles meeting the specifications provided for in RCW 70A.25.120.

[ 2021 c 65 s 34; 2002 c 285 s 3; 1991 c 199 s 213.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2021 c 65: See note following RCW 53.54.030.

Finding—1991 c 199: See note following RCW 70A.15.1005.

Effective dates—1991 c 199: See RCW 70A.15.9003.